Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.110

License renewal—Continuing education requirements.

(1) As a condition of renewing a license under this chapter, a licensed home inspector shall present satisfactory evidence to the board of having completed the continuing education requirements provided for in this section.

(2) Each applicant for license renewal shall complete at least twenty-four hours of instruction in courses approved by the board every two years.

[ 2008 c 119 s 11.]